Utah statutes.
57-14-401.   Inherent risks of activities with a recreational purpose on certain lands.

(1)  Notwithstanding Section 57-14-202 to the contrary, a person may not make a claim against or recover from an owner of any land, as defined in this chapter, including land in developed or improved, urban or semi-rural areas opened to the general public without charge, such as a lake, pond, park, trail, waterway, or other recreation site, for personal injury or property damage caused by the inherent risks of participating in an activity with a recreational purpose on the land.

(2)  Nothing in this section may be construed to relieve a person participating in a recreational purpose from an obligation that the person would have in the absence of this section to exercise due care or from the legal consequences of a failure to exercise due care.



Enacted by Chapter 212, 2013 General Session

